South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S439.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Manufacturing property tax exemption SECTION 1.    Section 12-37-220(B)(52) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (52)(a)(i) 42.8571 percent of the property tax value of manufacturing property assessed for property tax purposes pursuant to Section 12-43-220(a)(1). The exemption allowed by this item does not apply to property owned or leased by a public utility, as defined in Section 58-3-5, that is regulated by the Public Service Commission, regardless of whether the property is used for manufacturing. For purposes of this item, if the exemption is applied to real property, then it must be applied to the property tax value as it may be adjusted downward to reflect the limit imposed pursuant to Section 6, Article X of the South Carolina Constitution, 1895; (ii) to the extent any such monies are refunded or otherwise credited under this item to a public utility that is regulated by the Public Service Commission, regardless of whether the property is used for manufacturing, any such refund or credits must be flowed through to customers as a reduction in rates, as appropriate. (b) The revenue loss resulting from the exemption allowed by this item must be reimbursed and allocated to the political subdivisions of this State, including school districts, in the same manner as the Trust Fund for Tax Relief, not to exceed three hundred million dollars per year. In calculating estimated state individual and corporate income tax revenues for a fiscal year, the Board of Economic Advisors shall deduct amounts sufficient to account for the reimbursement required by this item. (c) Notwithstanding the exemption allowed by this item, in any year in which reimbursements are projected by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office to exceed the reimbursement cap in subitem (b), the exemption amount shall be proportionally reduced so as not to exceed the reimbursement cap. (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, property exempted from property taxes in the manner provided in this item is considered taxable property for purposes of bonded indebtedness pursuant to Section 15, Article X of the Constitution of this State. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2024. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________